Arkansas, session 2025, HB1592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 15, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 25 — Arkansas Alzheimer’s and Dementia Public Health Act

20-15-2501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Alzheimer’s and Dementia Public Health Act".

20-15-2502. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias are a growing
public health crisis, with significant social and economic impacts on
families and communities in Arkansas;
(2) Early detection, timely diagnosis, and coordinated care
improve outcomes and quality of life for individuals living with Alzheimer’s
disease and related dementias;
(3) Modifiable risk factors, such as physical inactivity,
hypertension, diabetes, obesity, and social isolation increase the risk of
*JMB280*
02/25/2025 2:54:55 PM JMB280

HB1592
cognitive decline, particularly in underserved communities;
(4) Dementia has strong links to chronic conditions such as
cardiovascular disease and diabetes, requiring integrated public health
strategies;
(5) Public health outreach, education for healthcare providers,
and healthcare access are essential to reducing the burden of dementia; and
(6) Improved data collection and analysis are necessary to
monitor progress, identify gaps, and inform public health policy and resource
allocation.

20-15-2503. Interagency collaboration.
(a) The Department of Human Services and the Department of Health
shall collaborate to implement the State Alzheimer’s State Plan to address
dementia and improve cognitive health.
(b) The implementation of the plan shall include:
(1) Partnerships with healthcare providers and community-based
organizations;
(2) The expansion of public health campaigns that address brain
health, caregiver support, and the links between chronic disease and
dementia;
(3) Applications for federal funding to address Alzheimer’s and
dementia; and
(4) Other national cognitive health initiatives as applicable.

20-15-2504. Public health outreach.
The Department of Human Services and the Department of Health shall
integrate cognitive health and dementia information and education into
existing public health programs, including without limitation:
(1) Education for healthcare providers, which shall include:
(A) The importance of early detection and timely diagnosis
of cognitive impairment;
(B) Information on the Medicare annual wellness visit for
individuals who are sixty-five (65) years of age and older;
(C) Awareness of the Medicare care planning billing code
for individuals with cognitive impairment; and
(D) Guidance on care planning, including treatment
02/25/2025 2:54:55 PM JMB280

HB1592
options, advanced directives, and referrals to resources; and
(2) Public awareness campaigns, which shall include in
nonclinical terms:
(A) Cognitive health and dementia risk reduction;
(B) Early warning signs of Alzheimer's disease and other
dementias;
(C) The value of early detection and timely diagnosis; and
(D) The relationship between Alzheimer's disease,
dementia, and other chronic health conditions.

20-15-2505. Data collection and reporting.
The Department of Human Services and the Department of Health shall:
(1) Enhance data collection and analysis related to Alzheimer’s
disease and related dementias to:
(A) Monitor prevalence and demographics across Arkansas;
and
(B) Integrate data from chronic disease programs to
identify trends; and
(2) Establish and update at least annually a publicly accessible
Alzheimer’s and Dementia Data Dashboard that:
(A) Provides data on the prevalence, demographics, and
geographic distribution of Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias;
(B) Includes metrics on healthcare utilization and long-
term care services;
(C) Highlights trends and outcomes related to public
health initiatives; and
(D) Reports on the utilization of the care planning code.

20-15-2506. Funding and resources.
(a) The Department of Human Services and the Department of Health
shall:
(1) Seek federal grants, private funding, and other resources to
support implementation of this subchapter; and
(2) Partner with nonprofit organizations, private entities, and
research institutions to maximize available resources to support
implementation of this subchapter.
02/25/2025 2:54:55 PM JMB280

HB1592
(b) The requirements of this subchapter are subject to the
availability of funds in each agency that may be used for data collection,
reporting, or other requirements of this subchapter.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Implementation dates.
The Department of Human Services and the Department of Health shall
begin implementing the education for healthcare providers and the public
awareness campaigns under § 20-15-2504 no later than January 1, 2026.




























02/25/2025 2:54:55 PM JMB280